Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-181
Person committed; health care; food and clothing.

Each person committed to the Department of Correctional Services shall have regular medical and dental care. Each person shall be adequately fed and clothed in accordance with the regulations of the Department of Correctional Services. No offender shall be required to wear stripes or other degrading apparel.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 12, p. 3079.